California statutes. Public Utilities Code
No person shall build or rebuild in any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room, used or to be used to contain, encase, cover, or conduct any wire, cable, or appliance to conduct or handle electricity, any opening which is at the surface of the ground, within the distance of three feet at any point from the rail of any railway or streetcar track. This section does not apply where satisfactory proof is submitted to the commission that it is impracticable or physically impossible to comply with this law in the space or location so designated by the proper municipal authorities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8054.

No person shall build or rebuild any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room, used or to be used, to contain, encase, cover, or conduct any wire, cable, or appliance to conduct or handle electricity unless the floor of the subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room is made of stone, concrete, brick, or other similar material not subject to decomposition. This section does not apply to any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room within which it is not intended or required that any human being perform work or labor or be employed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8055.

No person shall build or rebuild or maintain any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room used, or to be used, to contain, encase, cover, or conduct any wire, cable, or appliance to conduct or handle electricity, unless such subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room is kept at all times in a sanitary condition and free from stagnant water, seepage, or other drainage, or any offensive matter dangerous to health, either by sewer connection or otherwise. This section does not apply to any subway, manhole, chamber, or underground room within which it is not intended or required that any human being perform work or labor, or be employed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8056.

The commission may inspect all work which is included in the provisions of this article, and may make such further additions or changes as the commission deems necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public. The commission shall enforce the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8057.

Any violation of any provision of this article is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Electric Service Areas [8101. - 8108.]



  ARTICLE 1. Designation by Public Utilities Commission [8101. - 8108.]

8101.

Under certain conditions the sale and distribution of electric power and energy in the same geographical area both by an electrical utility and by an irrigation district, results in duplication of service, waste of materials, increase in costs, waste of manpower and economic loss, and is detrimental to the efficiency and best interests of such districts. It is the policy of this State to induce such utilities and irrigation districts to prevent or remove such economic waste and to adopt more efficient and economic methods of distribution of electric power and energy, and to that end encourage the definition of areas to be served or not to be served by
 each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

Any utility may petition the commission setting forth in its petition the following:

(a) That the petitioner and an irrigation district formed under the laws of this State are both engaged or propose to engage in the sale and distribution of electric power and energy in the described area or areas or in contiguous areas, or that the petitioner proposes to sell an electric distribution system in a described area, to such irrigation district.

(b) That the petitioner and irrigation district are desirous of entering into a contract in which, among
 other things, and as one of the considerations therefor, they consent to the limitation of areas which each are to serve or are to be excluded from serving.

(c) A copy of the contract or proposed contract.

(d) A description of the respective areas that the limitations will affect and the terms of the contract, if any, or the conditions, if any, existing in connection with such limitations or the sale or acquisition of a utility distribution system.

(e) A prayer that the commission issue its order limiting the area or areas within which the petitioner may, directly or indirectly, sell or distribute electric power or energy or define the area or areas within which the petitioner shall not sell or distribute electric power or energy as indicated in the petition and set forth in a contract or proposed
 contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

Thereupon, the commission shall cause an investigation to be made and may conduct such hearings in connection therewith as it considers desirable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

If the commission finds that it is for the best interests of the State and of the utility, and not incompatible with any public interest that the petition be granted, it shall make and issue its order limiting the area or areas within which the utility shall have the right and authority to sell or distribute electric power or energy, directly or indirectly, or define the area or areas within which the utility shall not have the right or authority to sell or distribute electric power or energy, directly or indirectly. The commission may, in its order, approve and thereby authorize the contract or conditions, if any, in connection therewith. No limitation or definition of
 area or areas or statement of conditions shall be included in the order except as contained in the petition and contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

Where limitation of areas to be served or limitations or designations of areas not to be served by the utility and by an irrigation district have heretofore been approved or are hereafter approved by the commission they shall be deemed to have complied with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8107.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 530, Statues of 1907), Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with this article or an order issued under it and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this article is a complete defense in such action or proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8108.

If, in any contract submitted and approved by the commission or in any order made by the commission pursuant to application and petition as in this article provided, it is provided that the utility is not to serve or furnish electric energy in a specified area or areas, or is to furnish or serve electric energy under limited or specified circumstances only, or is to refrain from serving or furnishing electric energy in certain specified areas or under certain specified circumstances or under certain specified limitations, then, from and after the effective date of such order of the commission, it shall be unlawful for the utility to serve electric energy in any area or in
 any manner which the contract and order provides that service shall not be rendered, and the affected district shall be entitled, as a matter of right, to an injunction to prevent any such unlawful act on the part of the utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Miscellaneous Regulations [8201. - 8290.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Adequate Water Service [8201. - 8204.]

8201.

Any water company having a franchise to use the streets of a city, shall properly and adequately serve with water the inhabitants of the territory for the service of which it has such franchise.

As used in this section, to “properly and adequately serve with water” includes furnishing water of a quality meeting or exceeding standards established by the State Department of Health pursuant to Section 4026 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

8202.

If the commission has jurisdiction of extensions and service in the city it shall enforce a compliance with Section 8201. If the commission does not have such jurisdiction, then the governing body of the city shall adopt rules to enforce a compliance with Section 8201.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8203.

In addition to the penalties which may be provided by the governing body of a city for failure to comply with such regulations adopted by it, any person aggrieved by the failure of any water company to comply with such regulations may recover, by civil action against such water company, twice the amount of damages he may sustain by reason of such failure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8204.

“Water company” as used in this article, includes any person, firm, or private corporation engaged in the business of supplying water for domestic use within any city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Railroad and Steamboat Police [8226. - 8227.]

8226.

The Governor of the state may, upon the application of any railroad company, appoint and commission during his or her pleasure one or more persons designated by the company, to serve at the expense of the company, as police officers, who shall have the powers and authority of peace officers listed in Section 830.33 of the Penal Code, after being duly sworn. The company designating these persons shall be responsible civilly for any abuse of their authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 82, Sec. 16.   Effective May 3, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8227.

Every peace officer designated under Section 8226 shall, when in uniform, wear in plain view a shield bearing the words “railroad police,” and the name of the company for which he or she is commissioned. When on duty, but not in uniform, the peace officer shall carry the shield upon his or her person and present it upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 82, Sec. 17.   Effective May 3, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Use of “Spotter” Reports [8251. - 8252.]

8251.

It is unlawful for any public service corporation, or agent, superintendent, or manager thereof, employing any special agent, detective, or person commonly known as a “spotter,” for the purpose of investigating, obtaining, and reporting to the employer information concerning its employees, to discipline or discharge any employee, where such act of discipline or the discharge is based upon a report by such special agent, detective, or spotter, which report involves a question of integrity, honesty, or a breach of rules of the employer, unless such employer, its agent, superintendent, or manager, gives notice and accords a hearing to the employee thus accused, when requested
 by the employee. At such hearing the employer shall state specific charges on which act of discipline or discharge is based, and the accused employee shall have the right to furnish testimony in his defense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

Each violation of this article by any person, firm, association, or corporation is a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. In case of a public service corporation committing any violation of this article, the imprisonment when imposed shall be imposed upon the officers or agents thereof committing such offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 362.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Retirement Fund Investment Losses [8276. - 8279.]

8276.

The commission shall prohibit any public utility that has any retirement funds invested in the government of Libya, or in any corporation based in that country, from including in its plant operating budget any losses incurred as a result of those investments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 31, Sec. 6.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8277.

The commission shall require every public utility to provide the commission with a list of its retirement fund investments in the government of Libya, or in any corporation based in that country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 31, Sec. 7.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8278.

The commission shall verify the accuracy of the information provided pursuant to Section 8277, and shall disallow any losses incurred as a result of investments in the government of Libya, or in any corporation based in that country, in establishing rates for the public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 31, Sec. 8.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8279.

This article does not prevent the commission from applying this article to public utility retirement fund investments in other countries such as, but not limited to, Libya, if comparable conditions warrant that application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 31, Sec. 9.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Women, Minority, Disabled Veteran, and LGBT Business Enterprises [8281. - 8286.]

8281.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the essence of the American economic system of private enterprise is free, open, and transparent competition. Only through free, open, and transparent competition can free markets, reasonable and just prices, and creative and innovative opportunities for growth of personal initiative and individual judgment be ensured. The preservation and expansion of that competition are basic to the economic well-being of this state and that well-being cannot be realized unless the actual and potential capacity of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises is encouraged and developed. Therefore, it is the declared policy of the state to aid the interests of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises in order to preserve reasonable and just prices and
 a free competitive enterprise, to ensure that a fair proportion of the total purchases and contracts or subcontracts for commodities, supplies, technology, property, and services for regulated public utilities, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, and rail projects, are awarded to women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises, and to maintain and strengthen the overall economy of the state.

(b) (1) The Legislature finds all of the following:

(A) The opportunity for full participation in our free enterprise system by women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises is essential if this state is to attain social and economic equality for those businesses and improve the functioning of the state economy. By providing more transparency on who is performing the work
 in the state, the state will see a broader and deeper economic impact.

(B) Public agencies and some regulated utilities that have established short- and long-range women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprise goals are awarding 30 percent or more of their contracts to these business enterprises.

(C) Women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises have traditionally received less than a proportionate share of regulated public utility procurement contracts, especially in renewable energy, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, and rail projects.

(D) It is in the state’s interest to expeditiously improve the economically disadvantaged position of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises. It is also in the state’s interest to see the number of
 women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises increase by unbundling the work with prime contractors and enabling subcontractors of the prime contractor to report their subcontracted spending with women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises to further enhance the opportunities for women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises.

(E) The position of these businesses can be substantially improved by providing long-range substantial goals for procurement by regulated public utilities of technology, equipment, supplies, services, materials, and construction work, especially in renewable energy, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, and rail projects, from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT businesses.

(F) That procurement also benefits the regulated public utilities and consumers of the state by
 encouraging the expansion of the number of suppliers for procurements, thereby encouraging competition among the suppliers and promoting economic efficiency in the process.

(G) That the long-term economic viability of this state depends substantially on the ability of renewable energy, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, and rail projects to incorporate women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT businesses into those projects.

(H) Employment within the state benefits local communities on many different levels, including, but not limited to, the state receiving more revenue from employee taxes, more consumable expenditures, and more wealth within the state. Monitoring employment beyond women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT entrepreneurs expands the economic reach to all suppliers and utilities operating in the state.

(2) It is the purpose of this article to do all of the following:

(A) Encourage greater economic opportunity for women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises.

(B) Promote competition among regulated public utility suppliers in order to enhance economic efficiency in the procurement of electrical, gas, water, wireless telecommunications service provider, and telephone corporation contracts and contracts of their commission-regulated subsidiaries and affiliates.

(C) Clarify and expand the program for the procurement by regulated public utilities of technology, equipment, supplies, services, materials, and construction work from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 3.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8282.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Control” means exercising the power to make policy decisions.

(b) “Disabled veteran business enterprise” has the same meaning as defined in Section 999 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(c) “LGBT business enterprise” means a business enterprise that is at least 51-percent owned by a lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender person or persons; or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender persons; and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those
 individuals.

(d) “Minority business enterprise” means a business enterprise that is at least 51-percent owned by a minority group or groups; or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minority groups, and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals. The contracting utility shall presume that minority includes African Americans, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, and Asian Pacific Americans.

(e) To “operate” means to be actively involved in the day-to-day management. It is not enough to merely be an officer or director.

(f) “Renewable energy project” means a project for the development and operation of an eligible renewable energy resource meeting the requirements of the California Renewables
 Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1).

(g) “Women business enterprise” means a business enterprise that is at least 51-percent owned by a woman or women; or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women; and whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of those individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 271.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8283.

(a) The commission shall require each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), and their commission-regulated subsidiaries and affiliates, to submit annually a detailed and verifiable plan for increasing procurement from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises in all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, vegetation management, and rail projects.

(b) These annual plans shall include short- and long-term goals and timetables, but not quotas,
 and shall include methods for encouraging both prime contractors and grantees to engage women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises in subcontracts in all categories that provide subcontracting opportunities, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, vegetation management, and rail projects.

(c) The commission shall establish guidelines for all electrical corporations, gas corporations, water corporations, wireless telecommunications service providers, electric service providers, and telephone corporations with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), and their commission-regulated subsidiaries and affiliates, to be used in establishing programs pursuant to this article.

(d) Every electrical corporation, gas corporation, water
 corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall furnish an annual report to the commission regarding the implementation of programs established pursuant to this article in a form that the commission shall require, and at the time that the commission shall annually designate.

(e) (1) The Legislature declares that each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, mobile telephony service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation that is not required to submit a plan pursuant to subdivision (a) is encouraged to voluntarily adopt a plan for increasing women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprise procurement in all categories.

(2) The Legislature
 declares that each cable television corporation, direct broadcast satellite provider, exempt wholesale generator contracting to sell electricity to a retail seller, distributed energy resource contractor, and energy storage system company is encouraged to voluntarily adopt a plan for increasing women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprise procurement and to voluntarily report activity in this area to the Legislature on an annual basis.

(f) The commission shall require each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), but not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), to annually submit data in a simplified form to the commission on its procurement from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises in
 all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, wireless telecommunications, broadband, smart grid, vegetation management, and rail projects.

(g) (1) As part of each annual report or data submission required pursuant to subdivision (d) or (f), the electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, or telephone corporation shall provide all of the following information in the aggregate:

(A) The number of new contractors and subcontractors certified pursuant to General Order 156 with which it contracted.

(B) The total dollar amounts expended with in-state contractors certified under General Order 156.

(C) The
 total dollar amounts expended with in-state subcontractors certified under General Order 156.

(D) The percentage of the total workforce used by contractors and subcontractors that reside in California.

(E) Data regarding the diversity of contractor or subcontractor workforces, to the extent that the data is provided voluntarily by the employees of the contractor or subcontractor.

(2) An electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, or telephone corporation may use data provided to the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8284 to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1).

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
 meanings:

(1) “Distributed energy resource contractor” means any corporation or other business entity that employs anyone licensed by the Contractors State License Board to perform installations of distributed energy resources, as defined in Section 8370.

(2) “Energy storage system company” means any person or corporation operating a centralized or distributed energy storage system, as defined in Section 2835, that furnishes electricity to an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, community choice aggregator, or electric service provider within California, or that supplies electricity to a retail end-use customer of an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, community choice aggregator, or electric service provider within California.

(3) “Other business entity” has the
 same meaning as defined in Section 174.5 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 4.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8284.

(a) (1) The commission shall, by rule or order, adopt criteria for verifying and determining the eligibility of women, minority, and LGBT business enterprises for procurement contracts.

(2) The commission shall adopt the Department of General Services’ disabled veteran business enterprise certification eligibility requirements for verifying and determining the eligibility of disabled veteran business enterprises for procurement contracts, and shall not deem eligible those disabled veteran business enterprises that are not certified by the Department of General Services.

(3) In initially adopting criteria for verifying and determining the eligibility of LGBT business enterprises for
 procurement contracts pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall adopt the LGBT status qualifiers created by the National Gay and Lesbian Chamber of Commerce. The commission may update these LGBT status qualifiers as appropriate.

(b) The commission shall add all of the following questions to the verification form described in General Order 156:

(1) Questions about the location of the business enterprise’s headquarters.

(2) Questions about the business enterprise’s operating locations in California.

(3) Questions about the percentage of the business enterprise’s employees that reside in California.

(c) The commission shall develop, and require every electrical corporation, gas
 corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) and their commission-regulated subsidiaries and affiliates to implement, an outreach program to inform and recruit women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises to apply for procurement contracts under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 5.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8285.

(a) Any person or corporation, through its directors, officers, or agents, that falsely represents a business as a women, minority, or LGBT business enterprise in the procurement of, or the attempt to procure, contracts from an electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, or telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), or a commission-regulated subsidiary or affiliate subject to this article, or from an electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), but not more than twenty-five
 million dollars ($25,000,000), shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In the case of a corporation, the fine or imprisonment, or both, shall be imposed on every director, officer, or agent responsible for the false statements.

(b) Any person or corporation, through its directors, officers, or agents, that falsely represents a business as a disabled veteran business enterprise in the procurement of, or the attempt to procure, contracts from an electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, or telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), or a commission-regulated subsidiary or affiliate subject to this article, or from an electrical
 corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), but not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), shall be punished according to the penalties established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 999.9 of the Military and Veterans Code. In the case of a corporation, the fine or imprisonment, or both, shall be imposed on every director, officer, or agent responsible for the false statements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 703, Sec. 7.   (SB 599)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8286.

(a) In order to facilitate the participation of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises and small businesses in contract procurement, any corporation subject to this article may consider the following measures to include those businesses in all phases of their contracting:

(1) Timely or progressive payments to those businesses.

(2) An amendment of the performance bond requirements so that bond requirements of electrical, gas, and telephone corporations do not prohibitively burden those businesses from procuring the corporation’s business.

(3) The provision of assistance to those businesses by securing contract
 payments to those businesses with letters of credit, negotiable securities, or other financing arrangements or measures.

(b) This section does not restrict a corporation’s ability to require a bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 703, Sec. 8.   (SB 599)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion Employment Report [8290. - 8290.2.]

8290.

(a) In addition to Section 8281, the Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) Public agencies and some regulated utilities should establish short- and long-term plans to advance diversity and equity, and include doing so in their employment practices.

(2) Encouraging utility work to be performed locally and with a reasonably proportionate number of employees from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT communities, the state is better serving and financially impacting the communities they serve.

(b) It is the declared policy of the state to aid the interests of women, minority, disabled veteran,
 and LGBT individuals by providing access to local jobs for women, minorities, disabled veterans, and LGBT individuals through strong diversity, equity, and inclusion plans.

(c) The purpose of this article is to promote and enhance diversity, equity, and inclusion employment plans for utilities in the state by including reporting entities’ workforce information in the commission’s analysis of the Supplier Diversity Program’s success.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 6.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8290.2.

(a) (1) The commission shall require each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), and their commission-regulated subsidiaries and affiliates, to annually submit to the commission a report describing the employment of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT individuals at all levels of employment within their organization and describing the diversity, equity, and inclusion policies or activities that promote equitable recruitment and hiring.

(2) The commission shall direct each community choice aggregator with
 gross annual revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), as described in subdivision (m) of Section 366.2, to annually submit to the commission a report describing the employment of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT individuals at all levels of employment within its organization and describing the diversity, equity, and inclusion policies or activities that promote equitable recruitment and hiring.

(b) Every entity specified in subdivision (a) shall furnish an annual report to the commission regarding the implementation of the programs established pursuant to this article in a form that the commission requires and at the time that the commission annually designates.

(c) (1) The Legislature declares that each community choice aggregator, electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, mobile telephony service provider,
 electric service provider, and telephone corporation that is not required to submit a report pursuant to subdivision (a) is encouraged to voluntarily adopt a plan for increasing women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT employment at all levels of employment in those entities.

(2) The Legislature declares that each cable television corporation, direct broadcast satellite provider, exempt wholesale generator contracting to sell electricity to a retail seller, distributed energy resource contractor, and energy storage system company is encouraged to voluntarily adopt a plan for increasing women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT employment at all levels of employment in those entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 6.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.1. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO PRIVATELY OWNED AND PUBLICLY OWNED PUBLIC UTILITIES [8301. - 8550.]



CHAPTER 1. Nuclear Powerplant Communities Information [8301. - 8302.]

8301.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Nuclear Powerplant Communities Information Act of 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1560, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

Every privately owned and publicly owned public utility generating electricity by means of any nuclear powerplant and every privately owned and publicly owned public utility with a nuclear powerplant that is no longer producing electricity but is in the decommissioning process or is still radioactive shall do both of the following:

(a) Provide periodically, as required by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, but at least every two years, by mail or by hand delivery, with that information as may be required by the commission to be disseminated to the public, either to all residents within a 10-mile radius of the powerplant or to those persons designated by the commission, whichever is the greater number of persons, a general description of the powerplant, emergency evacuation information, and substantive revisions thereof, and the titles, addresses, and telephone numbers of the federal, state, and local public officials who may be contacted for more detailed information concerning powerplant status and discharges.

(b) Provide, at least twice each year, a copy of the public utility’s “Effluent Monitoring Report” to the county health officer in the county where the nuclear powerplant is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1029, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Worksite Automated External Defibrillators [8310. - 8310.]

8310.

(a) Each utility, and independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility, shall do both of the following:

(1) Have an automated external defibrillator (AED) available for emergency use at each worksite where two or more electrical utility workers are performing work on electrical transmission or distribution lines of 601 volts or more.

(2) Adopt, consistent with its duty to furnish and use safety devices and safeguards as required by Section 6401 of the Labor Code and as part of its injury prevention program that conforms to the requirements of Section 6401.7 of the Labor Code, a written program of policies and procedures to ensure both of the following:

(A) Any person who renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using an AED shall activate the emergency medical services system as soon as possible and report the use of the AED to the local EMS agency.
